Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 23 Medication Aides

§§ 35-23-101 through 35-23-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 158, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which related to Medication Aides, derived from Laws 1989, ch. 209, § 1.

§ 35-23-106.
Sunset.

W.S.

35-23-101

through 35-23-105 are repealed effective June 30, 1996.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 158, § 1.

§ 35-23-107.
State health professional training enhancement program.

The department is authorized to provide education training opportunities for persons engaged in the health care professions who provide direct client care. The department may enter into agreements with individuals entering the program and attending an accredited university or community college program in a health care related field of study. The terms of the agreement shall include:

The department shall provide the person an educational assistance loan of up to six thousand dollars ($6,000.00) and up to one-half (1/2) the monthly salary the person was earning at the time of entering an educational or training program acceptable to the department, for each year the person is satisfactorily enrolled in the educational or training program;

Upon completion of the educational or training program, the person shall work for one (1) of the departments, institutions or health programs within the state for a period of two (2) years for each year of education or training during which the person received both an educational assistance loan and salary, or if the person only received the educational assistance loan the obligation would be one (1) year of state employment for each year of educational assistance;

If the person fails to complete the educational or training program or fails to return to the employ of the state, he shall be required to immediately repay the educational assistance loan and any unearned salary provided by the department for attendance in the educational or training program;

Any other provision the department deems necessary or appropriate to accomplish the purposes of the program.

The department is authorized to enter into agreements with health professionals who have completed a health care educational or training program from an accredited university or community college program to provide immediate relief for health professional position vacancies in the state. The terms of the agreement shall include:

The department will pay up to six thousand dollars ($6,000.00) in educational loan repayment for each year a person is employed by the department in an area where there is a shortage of health professionals;

The person shall work for a minimum of three (3) years for the department under the agreement. Voluntary failure to complete the employment obligation will require the person to immediately repay any educational loan assistance made by the state on the person’s behalf;

Any other provision the department deems necessary or appropriate to accomplish the purposes of the program.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 50, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to use of medication aides at the state training school, see §

25-5-135

.